North Carolina, session 2025, SB284.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction for the 2025-2026 fiscal year the sum of eight million three hundred thousand
dollars ($8,300,000) in nonrecurring funds to be allocated as a directed grant to Guilford County
Schools to support academic support programs and improve facilities as follows:
(1) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) to support the high dosage tutoring program
by hiring more tutors, expanding tutoring subject areas, and offering more
tutoring sessions.
(2) Three million three hundred thousand dollars ($3,300,000) to support the
learning hub program by providing students that are at risk of not graduating
a flexible, individualized program to complete graduation requirements and
increase graduation rates.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S284-v-1*